Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.370

Trafficking of persons—Clearinghouse on human trafficking—Functions.

(1) The office of crime victims advocacy is designated as the single point of contact in state government regarding the trafficking of persons.

(2) The Washington state clearinghouse on human trafficking is created as an information portal to share and coordinate statewide efforts to combat the trafficking of persons. The clearinghouse will include an internet website operated by the office of crime victims advocacy, and will serve the following functions:

(a) Coordinating information regarding all statewide task forces relating to the trafficking of persons including, but not limited to, sex trafficking, commercial sexual exploitation of children, and labor trafficking;

(b) Publishing the findings and legislative reports of all statewide task forces relating to the trafficking of persons;

(c) Providing a comprehensive directory of resources for victims of trafficking; and

(d) Collecting and disseminating up-to-date information regarding the trafficking of persons, including news and legislative efforts, both state and federal.

[ 2015 c 273 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 c 273: "(1) The legislature has long been committed to increasing access to support services for human trafficking victims and promoting awareness of human trafficking throughout Washington state. In 2002, Washington was the first state to work on human trafficking by enacting new laws and by creating an antitrafficking task force. In 2003, Washington was the first state to enact a law making human trafficking a crime.

Since 2002, the Washington state legislature has enacted thirty-eight laws to combat human trafficking. In 2013 and 2014, Washington received top marks from two leading nongovernmental organizations for the strength of its antitrafficking laws. The polaris project gave Washington a perfect score of ten and Washington received an "A" report card from shared hope international's protected innocence challenge. In light of the 2010 winter olympic games taking place in Vancouver, British Columbia, the legislature enacted RCW 47.38.080, permitting an approved nonprofit to place informational human trafficking posters in restrooms located in rest areas along Interstate 5. Sporting events, such as the winter olympic games or the upcoming 2015 United States open golf tournament at Chambers Bay, provide lucrative opportunities for human traffickers to exploit adults and children for labor and sexual services. The legislature finds that an effective way to combat human trafficking is to increase awareness of human trafficking for both victims and the general public alike as well as who and how to contact for help and support services, for both victims and the general public alike.

(2) Human trafficking data are primarily obtained through a hotline reporting system in which victims and witnesses can report cases of human trafficking over the phone. Since 2007, there have been one thousand eight hundred fifty human trafficking calls made through the human trafficking victim hotline system in Washington state, and a total of four hundred thirty-two human trafficking cases reported. It is the intent of the legislature to facilitate an even wider scope of communication with human trafficking victims and witnesses by requiring human trafficking information to be posted in all public restrooms." [ 2015 c 273 s 1.]

Effective date—2015 c 273: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2015]." [ 2015 c 273 s 6.]